Rhode Island, session 2025, SB130.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37-15-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-15 entitled "Litter Control
and Recycling" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-15-7. Penalties.
(a) Any person convicted of a first violation of this chapter shall, except where a penalty is
specifically set forth, be subject to a fine of not less than eighty-five dollars ($85.00) two hundred
dollars ($200), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine
imposed hereunder, the person so convicted may be ordered to pick up litter for not less than two
(2) twenty (20), nor more than twenty-five (25) forty (40), hours.
(b) Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this chapter shall, except
where a penalty is specifically set forth, be subject to a fine of not less than three hundred dollars
($300), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine imposed
upon a second or subsequent violation of this chapter, the person so convicted may be ordered to
pick up litter for not less than four (4) twenty (20), nor more than fifty (50), hours.
(c) Jurisdiction to punish violators of the provisions of this chapter is conferred on the
traffic tribunal.
(d) Any person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall, in addition to all other
penalties, be liable for the removal of all litter or ordered to pay restitution for the cost of removal
of all litter illegally disposed of by that person. The traffic tribunal may hold the registration of any

vehicle owned by the violator and used in the act of littering until the aforementioned liability is
satisfied.
(e) The funds received by a state law enforcement agency shall be deposited as general
revenues; provided, however, that thirty percent (30%) of any fine collected pursuant to a complaint
filed by a local law enforcement agency shall inure to the benefit of that agency, with remittances
to be made not less often than once every three (3) months.
(f) Penalties of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) two hundred dollars ($200) for violations of
this section may be disposed of without the necessity of personally appearing before the traffic
tribunal. Said penalty may be handled administratively by mailing a check or money order, together
with the properly executed form provided, to the appropriate address as set forth in the summons
issued by the enforcing agent.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000487
========
LC000487 - Page 2 of 3